Utah statutes.
17-53-314.   Restrictions on county procurement of architect-engineer
services.
(1)  As used in this section, "architect-engineer services" means those
professional services within the scope of the practice of architecture as
defined in Section 58-3a-102, or professional engineering as defined in
Section 58-22-102.
(2)  When a county elects to obtain architect or engineering services by using
a competitive procurement process and has provided public notice of its
competitive procurement process:
(a)  a higher education entity, or any part of one, may not submit a proposal
in response to the county's competitive procurement process; and
(b)  the county may not award a contract to perform the architect or
engineering services solicited in the competitive procurement process to a
higher education entity or any part of one.
